 848  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 Millions of European and Asian immigrants, as well as migrants from America’s rural areas, streamed into cities, attracted by the plentiful jobs and excitements they offered. “We cannot all live in cities,” cautioned Horace Greeley, the New York newspaper editor and Democratic presidential candidate in 1872, “yet nearly all seem determined to do so.” The growth of cities brought an array of problems, among them widespread poverty, unsanitary living conditions, and new forms of political corruption. How to feed, shelter, and educate the new city dwellers taxed the imaginations and resources of government officials. Even more challenging was the development of neighborhoods divided by racial and ethnic background as well as social class. At the same time, researchers were making discoveries that improved public health, economic productivity, and communications. Advances in modern science stimulated public support for higher education, but also opened up doubts about many l­ong-​­accepted “truths” and religious beliefs. More and more people began to question the literal truth of the Bible.

 political culture

 Political life during the Gilded Age was shaped by three main factors: the balance of power between Democrats and Republicans, the high level of public participation in everyday politics, and the often corrupt alliance between business and political leaders at all levels of government. In 1873, Job Stevenson, an Ohio congressman, claimed that members of the House of Representatives were so often selling their votes to Big Business lobbyists that it should have been renamed an “auction room.” The most important political issue of the Gilded Age, however, was the growing conflicts between city and country, industry and agriculture. Millions of financially distressed farmers felt ignored or betrayed by the political process. While industrialists and large commercial farmers prospered, small farmers struggled with falling crop prices, growing indebtedness to banks and railroads, and what they considered ­big-​­city greed and exploitation. By the 1890s, discontented farmers would channel their frustrations into political action and enliven a growing movement to expand (“inflate”) the nation’s money supply as a way to relieve economic distress. The election of 1896 symbolized the central conflict of the Gilded Age: the clashing cultural and economic values of two Americas, one older, ­small-​­scale, and rural, the other newer, ­large-​­scale, and urban.

 america’s move to town

 Americans moved to towns and cities after the Civil War, many of which evolved into major metropolitan areas. People from rural areas were attracted by the jobs and excitements of city life. Many had been pushed off the land by new agricultural machinery that sharply reduced the need for farmworkers. Four farmworkers or ranchers could now

Urban America  849


 perform the labor that earlier had required fourteen. Immigrants especially congregated in the cities along the Atlantic and Pacific coast where they arrived on ships from Europe or Asia. “The greater part of our population must live in cities,” announced Josiah Strong, a prominent Congregationalist minister, in 1898. “There was no resisting the trend.” While the Far West had the greatest proportion of urban dwellers, concentrated in cities such as San Francisco and Denver, the Northeast and Midwest held far more people in huge c­ ities—​­New York, Boston, Philadelphia, Pittsburgh, Chicago, Cincinnati, St. Louis, and others. More and more of these city dwellers had little or no money and nothing but their labor to sell. By 1900, more than 90 percent of the people in New York City’s most densely populated borough, Manhattan, lived in rented houses or in congested, ­low-​­cost buildings called tenements, where residents, many of them immigrants, were packed like sardines in poorly ventilated and poorly lit apartments.

 growth in all directions

 Several advances in technology helped city buildings handle the surging populations. In the 1870s, heating innovations, such as steam radiators, enabled the construction of much larger apartment buildings, since c­ oal-​­burning fireplaces and chimneys, expensive to build, were no longer needed in each apartment. In 1889, the Otis Elevator Company installed the first electric elevator, which made it possible to construct much taller buildings; before the 1860s, few structures had been more than five or six stories. During the 1880s, engineers also developed ­cast-​­iron and s­ teel-​ ­frame construction techniques that allowed for taller s­ tructures—“skyscrapers.” Cities grew out as well as up, as ­horse-​­drawn streetcars and commuter railways let people live farther away from their downtown workplaces. In 1873, San Francisco became the first city to use cable cars that clamped onto a moving underground cable driven by a central power source. Some cities ran ­steam-​­powered trains on elevated tracks, but by the 1890s, electric trolleys were preferred. Mass transit received an added boost from underground subway trains built in Boston, New York City, and Philadelphia. The commuter trains and trolleys allowed a growing middle class of business executives and professionals (accountants, doctors, engineers, sales clerks, teachers, store managers, and attorneys) to retreat from crowded downtowns to quieter, t­ ree-​­lined “streetcar suburbs.” But the working poor, many of them immigrants or African Americans, could rarely afford to leave the inner cities. As their populations grew, cities became dangerously congested and plagued with fires, violent crimes, and diseases.

 crowds, dirt, and disease

 The wonders of big ­cities—​­electric lights, streetcars, telephones, department stores, theaters, and many other

 850  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

THE EMERGENCE OF LARGE CITIES, 1880

Boston
Buffalo
Detroit


Milwaukee


Newark
Pittsburgh


Cleveland


Chicago


Jersey City
Washington


Cincinnati


Percentage of Population Living in Cities
 Over 60 percent 40–60 percent 20–39 percent Under 20 percent Cities with population over 100,000

■


Philadelphia
Baltimore


San Francisco
St. Louis


Providence
New York
Brooklyn


Louisville


New Orleans






500 Miles


500 Kilometers


 Which states had the largest urban populations in 1880?

 WWN64 ■ What drove the growth of western cities? How were western cities different from Figure M19_1 eastern cities? First proof

 a­ ttractions—​­were magnetic lures for rural youth bored by the routines of isolated farm life. Thousands moved to the cities in search of economic opportunity and personal freedom. Yet in doing so they often traded one set of problems for another. In New York City in 1900, some 2.3 million p ­ eople—​­two-​­thirds of the city’s population—​­ ­ were living in overcrowded, often filthy tenement housing. Such urban growth frequently occurred with little planning or regulations. Rapidly expanding cities often suffered from poor housing, unhealthy living conditions, and frequent infectious diseases and fires. “The only trouble with New York City,” said writer Mark Twain, “is that it is too large. You cannot accomplish anything in the way of business . . . ​without devoting a whole day to it. The distances are too great.” Tenement buildings were usually six to eight stories tall, lacked elevators, and were jammed so tightly together that most of the apartments had little or no natural light or fresh air. They typically housed ­twenty-​­four to ­thirty-​­two families,

Urban America  851


THE EMERGENCE OF LARGE CITIES, 1920
Seattle Portland 
Lowell
Boston
Rochester Worcester
Buffalo New Haven Providence
Detroit
New York
Newark
Milwaukee
Brooklyn
Pittsburgh
Cleveland
Chicago
Jersey City
Omaha
Washington
Philadelphia
Cincinnati
Richmond
Baltimore
Kansas City
Louisville
St. Louis
Minneapolis


Salt Lake City
San Francisco


Denver


Nashville
Memphis


Los Angeles


Atlanta


Birmingham
Dallas


Percentage of Population Living in Cities
 Over 60 percent 40–60 percent 20–39 percent Under 20 percent Cities with population over 100,000

Houston


New Orleans






500 Miles


500 Kilometers


 ■ How did technology change urban life in the early twentieth century? WWN64 Figure M19_2was the role of mass transit in expanding the urban population? ■ What First■ proof How did the demographics of the new cities change between 1880 and 1920?

 usually with lots of children who had few places to play except in the streets. On average, there was only one toilet (called a privy) for every twenty people. Late ­nineteenth-​­century cities were dirty, smelly, and disease ridden. The ­child-​­mortality rate in many tenements was as high as 40 percent. Streets were filled with contaminated water, horse urine and manure, and roaming pigs. Garbage and raw sewage were carelessly dumped into streets and waterways, causing epidemics of infectious diseases such as cholera, typhoid fever, and yellow fever. In one poor Chicago district at the end of the century, three of every five babies died before their first birthday. S­ o-​­called sanitary r­ eformers—​­public health officials and ­engineers—​ ­eventually created regulations requiring more space per resident as well as more windows and plumbing facilities. Reformers also pushed successfully for new water and sewage systems and for regular trash collection. They lobbied to ban slaughterhouses and the raising of hogs and cattle within city limits, and to replace ­horse-​­drawn trolleys with ­electric-​­powered streetcars or trolleys.

 852  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 Urbanization and the environment A garbage cart retrieves trash in New York City, ca. 1890.

The New Immigration
 America’s roaring prosperity and promise of political and religious freedom attracted waves of immigrants from every part of the globe after the Civil War. By 1900, nearly 30 percent of the residents of major cities were ­foreign-​­born. These newcomers provided ­much-​­needed labor for the growing economy, but their arrival also sparked racial and ethnic tensions.

 a surge of newcomers from europe

Immigration has
 always been one of the most powerful forces shaping American history. This was especially true between 1860 and 1900, as more and more immigrants, most of them poor, arrived from eastern and southern Europe. The number of immigrants rose from just under 3 million annually in the 1870s to more than 5 million per year in the 1880s, and reached nearly 9 million annually in the first decade of the twentieth century. In 1890, four out of five New Yorkers were ­foreign-​­born, a higher proportion than in any other city in the world. Chicago was not far behind. Rapidly growing industries seeking ­low-​­wage ­workers—​­including mines, railroads, mills, and f­ actories—​­sent recruiting agents abroad to stir up interest

The New Immigration  853


 Ellis Island To accommodate the soaring numbers of immigrants passing through New York City, Congress built a reception center on Ellis Island, near the Statue of Liberty. Pictured here is its registry room, where immigrants awaited close questioning by officials.

 in migration to the United States. Under the Contract Labor Act of 1864, the federal government helped pay for immigrants’ travel expenses to America. The law was repealed in 1868, but not until 1885 did the government stop companies from importing foreign laborers, a practice that put immigrant workers under the control of their employers. The ­so-​­called “old immigrants” who came before 1880 were mainly Protestants and Roman Catholics from northern and western Europe. This pattern began to change, however, as the proportion of immigrants from southern and eastern Europe, especially Russia, Poland, Greece, and Italy, rose sharply. After 1890, these “new immigrants” made up a majority of the newcomers, and by the first decade of the new century, they formed 70 percent. Their languages and cultural backgrounds were markedly different from those of most old immigrants or of most ­native-​­born Americans. The dominant religions of the new immigrants, for example, were Judaism, Eastern Orthodox, and Roman Catholicism, whereas Protestants still formed a large majority of the total U.S. population.

 854  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 In 1907, Congress appointed the bipartisan Dillingham Commission to examine the changes in immigration patterns. In its f­ orty-​­one-​­volume report, released in 1911, the Commission concluded that the “new” immigrants were far less intelligent than the old, approximately ­one-​­third of all those over 14 years of age when admitted being illiterate. Racially, they are for the most part essentially unlike the British, German and other peoples who came during the prior period to 1880, and generally speaking they are actuated in coming by different ideals, for the old immigration came to be a part of the country, while the new in a large measure, comes with the intention of profiting, in a pecuniary way, by the superior advantages of the new world and then returning to the old country. Immigrants were usually desperately poor and needed to find ­jobs—​­quickly. Many were greeted at the docks by family and friends, others were met by representatives of ­immigrant-​­aid societies or by company agents offering ­low-​ ­paying and often dangerous jobs in mines, mills, sweatshops, and on railroads. Since most immigrants knew little if any English and nothing about American employment practices, they were easy targets for exploitation. Many unwittingly lost a healthy percentage of their wages to unscrupulous hiring agents in exchange for a bit of whiskey and a job. Companies eager for workers gave immigrants train tickets to inland cities such as Buffalo, Pittsburgh, Cleveland, Chicago, Milwaukee, Cincinnati, and St. Louis. As strangers in America, most immigrants naturally wanted to live in neighborhoods populated by people from their homeland. The largest cities had vibrant immigrant districts with names such as Little Italy, Little Hungary, and Chinatown, where immigrants practiced their native religions and customs, and spoke and read newspapers in their native languages. But they paid a price for such community solidarity. When new immigrants moved into an area, the previous residents often moved out, taking with them whatever social prestige and political influence they had achieved. Living conditions often quickly deteriorated as housing and sanitation codes went unenforced.

 the nativist response

 Then, as now, many ­native-​­born Americans saw the newest immigrants as a threat to their jobs and way of life. Many “nativists” were racists who believed that “­Anglo-​­Saxon” ­Americans—​­people of British or Germanic ­background—​­were superior to the Slavic, Italian, Greek, and Jewish newcomers. A Stanford University professor called immigrants from southern and eastern Europe “illiterate, docile, lacking in s­elf-​ ­reliance and initiative, and not possessing the ­Anglo-​­Teutonic conceptions of

The New Immigration  855


 Mulberry Street, 1900 This photograph captures the many Italian immigrants who made Mulberry Street in downtown New York City their home at the turn of the century. ­Horse-​­drawn carts weave through people shopping, socializing, and ­people-​­gazing.

 law, order, and government.” Many were illiterate, but others only appeared so because they could not speak or read English. Some resorted to crime to survive, fueling suspicions that European nations were sending their criminals to America. Throughout American history, Congress has passed laws regulating immigration; largely, these statutes have been inconsistent in their goals and frequently motivated by racial and ethnic prejudice. During the late nineteenth century, such prejudice took an especially ugly turn against the Chinese. By 1880, some 75,000 Chinese formed about a ninth of the population of California. They were the first ­non-​­European and ­non-​­African group to migrate in large numbers to America. Chinese immigrants were easy targets for discrimination; they were not white, they were not Christian, and many could not read or write. Whites resented them for supposedly taking their jobs, although in many instances the Chinese were willing to do menial work that whites refused to do. John Jeong, a young Chinese immigrant, arrived in San Francisco and quickly encountered ethnic persecution. As he and others made their way to the Chinatown neighborhood in an open carriage, “some white boys came up and started throwing rocks at us.” Another Chinese newcomer ­experienced

 856  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 similar treatment. Whenever he and his friends strayed outside their own neighborhood, the “whites would attack you with stones.” In 1882, ­anti-​­Chinese sentiment in Congress prompted passage of the Chinese Exclusion Act, the first federal law to restrict the immigration of free people on the basis of race and class. The act, which barred unskilled Chinese laborers from entering the country for ten years, was periodically renewed before being extended indefinitely in 1902. With the Chinese Exclusion Act, the golden door welcoming Chinese Exclusion Act The Chinese foreigners to the United States began to caricature “John Chinaman” is escorted close. Not until 1943 were barriers to out of America by Lady Liberty with his Chinese immigration finally removed. ironing board and opium pipe, while The Chinese were not the only other accepted minorities look on. group targeted. In 1887, Protestant activists in Iowa formed the American Protective Association (APA), a secret organization whose members pledged never to employ or vote for a Roman Catholic. Working often within local Republican party organizations, the APA quickly enlisted 2.5 million members and helped shape the 1894 election results in Ohio, Wisconsin, Indiana, Missouri, and Colorado. In 1891, nativists in New England formed the Immigration Restriction League to save the ­Anglo-​­Saxon “race” from being “contaminated” by “alien” immigrants, especially Roman Catholics and Jews. The League sought to convince Congress to ban immigrants who were illiterate. Three presidents vetoed bills banning illiterate immigrants: Grover Cleveland in 1897, William H. Taft in 1913, and Woodrow Wilson in 1915 and 1917. The last time, however, Congress overrode the veto, and the restriction of illiterate immigrants became law.

Cultural Life
 The flood of people into cities brought changes in recreation and leisure. ­Middle-​­and ­upper-​­class families, especially those in streetcar suburbs, often spent free time together at home, singing around a piano, reading novels, or

Cultural Life  857


 playing games. In congested urban areas, politics as a form of public entertainment attracted large crowds, and saloons became even more popular social centers for ­working-​­class men. New forms of mass ­entertainment—​­movie theaters, music halls, vaudeville shows featuring singers, dancers, and comedians; art museums, symphony orchestras, sporting events, and ­circuses—​­drew a broad c­ ross-​­section of residents. In large cities, new streetcar transit systems allowed people to travel easily to sporting events, and rooting for the home team helped unify a city’s ethnic and racial groups and social classes. By the end of the century, sports of all kinds had become a major part of popular culture. Urbanization and technological progress also contributed to the prestige of modern science. By encouraging what one writer called a “mania for facts,” scientists generated changes throughout social, intellectual, and cultural life. Scientific research led to transformational technologies such as electric power and lights, telephones, phonographs, motion pictures, bicycles, and automobiles. Although only men could vote in most states, both men and women flocked to hear candidates speak at political meetings. In the largest cities, membership in a political party offered many social benefits. As labor unions became increasingly common, they too took on social roles for ­working-​­class men.

 Vaudeville For as little as 1¢ for admission, vaudeville shows aimed to please the tastes of their wildly diverse audience with a great range of entertainment.

 858  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 saloons

 Still, the most popular leisure destinations for the urban working class were saloons, beer gardens, and dance halls. By 1900, the United States had more saloons (over 325,000) than grocery stores and meat markets. New York City alone had 10,000 saloons, 1 for every 500 residents. Saloons were the workingman’s social club and were especially popular among male immigrants seeking companionship in a strange land. In cities such as New York, Boston, Philadelphia, and Chicago, the customers were disproportionately Irish, German, and Italian Catholics. Politics was often the topic of intense discussions in saloons; in fact, in New York City in the 1880s, saloons doubled as polling places, where patrons could cast their votes in elections. One journalist called the saloon “the social and intellectual center of the neighborhood.” Men also went to saloons to check job postings, engage in labor union activities, cash paychecks, mail letters, read newspapers, and gossip. Because saloons were heated and offered public restrooms, they served as refuges for the homeless, especially in the winter. Patrons could play chess, billiards, darts, cards, dice, or even handball, since many saloons included gymnasiums. Although the main barroom was for men only, women and children were allowed to enter a side door to buy a pail of beer to carry home (a task called “rushing the growler”). Some saloons also provided “snugs,” separate rooms for women customers. “Stall saloons” included “wine rooms” where prostitutes worked.

 leisure for women

 Married ­working-​­class women had even less leisure time than w ­ orking-​­class men. Many were working for pay themselves, and even those who were not were frequently overwhelmed by housework and ­child-​­rearing responsibilities. As a social worker noted, “The men have the saloons, political clubs, t­ rade-​­unions or [fraternal] lodges for their recreation . . . ​while the mothers have almost no recreation, only a dreary round of work, day after day, with occasionally doorstep gossip to vary the monotony of their lives.” Married w ­ orking-​­class women often used the streets as their public space. Washing clothes, supervising children at play, or shopping at the local market provided opportunities for socializing. Single women, many of whom worked as domestic servants (“maids”) and had more leisure time than working mothers, flocked to dance halls, theaters, amusement parks, and picnic grounds. With the advent of movie theaters, the cinema became the most popular form of entertainment for working women. As an advertisement promised, “If you are tired of life, go to the movies. If you are sick of troubles rife, go to the picture show. You will forget your unpaid bills, rheumatism and other ills, if you stow your pills and go to the picture show.”

Cultural Life  859


 Steeplechase Park, Coney Island, Brooklyn, New York Members of the working class could afford the inexpensive rides at this popular amusement park.

The Impact of Darwinism
 Virtually every field of thought felt the impact of natural scientist Charles Darwin’s controversial On the Origin of Species (1859), one of the most influential books ever written. Basing his conclusions on extensive yet “imperfect” field research, Darwin showed how the chance processes of evolution give energy and unity to life. At the center of his concept was what Darwin called “natural selection.” He demonstrated that most organisms produce many more offspring than can survive. Those offspring with certain favorable characteristics adapt and live, while others die from starvation, disease, or predators. This “struggle for existence” in a crowded world drove the process of natural selection, Darwin said. Over many millions of years, modern species “evolved” from less complex forms of life; individuals and species that had characteristics advantageous for survival reproduced, while others fell by the wayside. As Darwin wrote, “the vigorous, the healthy, and the happy survive and multiply.” Darwin’s theory of biological evolution was shocking because most people still embraced a literal interpretation of the biblical creation story, which claimed that all species were created at the same moment by God and remained the same thereafter. Although Darwin had trained for the ministry and was

 860  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 reluctant to be drawn into religious controversy, his biological findings suggested to many, then and since, that there was no providential God controlling the universe. People were no different from plants and animals; they too evolved by trial and error rather than by God’s purposeful hand. What came to be called Darwinism spelled the end of a ­God-​­given world. Many Christians charged that Darwin’s ideas led to atheism, a denial of the existence of God, while others found their faith severely shaken not only by evolutionary theory but also Charles Darwin Darwin’s scientific by new scientific standards of scholarly theories influenced more than a century analysis that were being applied to the of political and social debate. Bible. Most of the faithful, however, came to reconcile science and religion. They decided that the process of evolutionary change in nature must be God’s doing.

 social darwinism

 Although Darwin’s theory of evolution applied only to biological phenomena, many applied it to human society. Englishman Herbert Spencer, a leading social philosopher, was the first major prophet of what came to be called social Darwinism. Spencer argued that human society and its institutions, like the organisms studied by Darwin, evolved through the same process of natural selection. The “survival of the fittest,” in Spencer’s chilling phrase, was the engine of social progress. By encouraging people, ideas, and nations to compete with one another for dominance, society would generate “the greatest perfection and the most complete happiness.” Darwin dismissed Spencer’s social theories as “unconvincing.” He did not believe that the evolutionary process in the natural world had any relevance to human social institutions. Others, however, eagerly endorsed social Darwinism. E. L. Youmans, founding editor of Popular Science Monthly, became the foremost champion of Spencer’s ideas in America. He claimed that in the United States, Darwinism really meant Spencerism, the “­anti-​­philanthropic, ­anti-​­meddling side” of Spencer’s philosophy. If, as Spencer believed, society naturally evolved for the better through “survival of the fittest,” then interference

Cultural Life  861


 with human competition in the marketplace was a serious mistake because it would help “unfit” people survive, and thereby hinder progress. Social Darwinism implied the need for ­hands-​­off, ­laissez-​­faire government policies; it argued against the regulation of business or of required minimum standards for sanitation and housing. To Spencer, the only acceptable charity was voluntary, and even that was of dubious value. Spencer warned that “fostering the g­ ood-​­for-​­nothing [people] at the expense of the good, is an extreme cruelty” to the health of civilization. For Spencer and his many American supporters, successful businessmen and corporations provided proof of the concept of “survival of the fittest.” If the unregulated process of capitalist development led to small businesses being destroyed or acquired by huge corporate monopolies, it was simply a necessary phase of the evolutionary process. Oil tycoon John D. Rockefeller revealed his own embrace of social Darwinism when he told his Baptist S­ unday-​­school class that the “growth of a large business is merely a survival of the fittest. . . . ​ This is not an evil tendency in business. It is merely the ­working-​­out of a law of nature and a law of God.” Popular Science Monthly, founded in 1872, became the chief magazine for promoting social Darwinism in the United States. That year, Spencer’s chief academic disciple, William Graham Sumner, began teaching at Yale University, where he preached the gospel of natural selection. Sumner’s most lasting contribution, made in his book Folkways (1907), was to argue that it would be a mistake for government to try to promote equality, since doing so would interfere with the “survival of the fittest.”

 reform darwinism

 Sumner’s efforts to use Darwinism to promote “rugged individualism” and oppose government regulation of business prompted an alternative use of Darwinism in the context of human society. What came to be called reform Darwinism found its major advocate in Lester Frank Ward, a government employee who fought his way up from poverty and never lost his empathy for the underdog. Ward’s Dynamic Sociology (1883) singled out one aspect of evolution that both Darwin and Spencer had neglected: the human brain. True, as Sumner claimed, people, like animals, compete. But, as Ward explained, people also collaborate. Unlike animals, people can plan for a distant future; they have minds capable of shaping and directing social change. Far from being the helpless object of irresistible evolutionary forces, Ward argued, humanity could actively control social evolution through ­long-​­range planning. Ward’s reform Darwinism held that cooperation, not competition, would better promote social progress. Government, in Ward’s view, should pursue two main goals: alleviating poverty, which impeded the development of the

 862  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 mind, and promoting the education of the masses. Intellect, informed by science, could foster social improvement. Reform Darwinism would prove to be one of the pillars of the “progressive” movement during the late nineteenth century and after.

Realism in Literature and Art
 Before the Civil War, Romanticism had dominated American literature and painting. Romantics such as the transcendentalists in New England believed that fundamental truths rested in the unseen world of ideas and spirit. The most prominent writers and artists were more concerned with romantic or biblical themes than with depicting everyday life. During the second half of the nineteenth century, however, a new generation calling themselves “realists” began to challenge the Romantic tradition. A writer in Putnam’s Monthly noted in 1854 a growing emphasis on “the real and the practical.” This emphasis on “realism” matured into a f­ ull-​­fledged cultural force, as more and more writers and artists focused on depicting the actual aspects of u ­ rban-​­industrial America: scientific research and technology, factories and railroads, cities and immigrants, labor unions and social tensions. For many Americans, the horrors of the Civil War had led to a less romanticized and more realistic view of life. An editor attending an art exhibition in 1865 sensed “the greater reality of feeling developed by the war. We have grown more sober, perhaps, and less patient of romantic idealism.” Another factor contributing to the rise of realism was the impact of modern science. “This is a world of reality,” admitted a Romantic writer, “and romance breaks against the many hard facts.” The “stupendous power of Science,” announced one editor, will rid American thought of “every ­old-​­time idea, every trace of old romance and art, poetry and romantic or sentimental feeling” and wash away the “ideal . . . ​and visionary.” Realism, as writer Fanny Bates stressed, appealed especially to people living in busy, swarming cities, people “whose lives are crowded with a variety of interests.” The worship of money was the most common theme in realistic novels and short stories during the Gilded Age. In William Dean Howells’s The Rise of Silas Lapham (1885), Bromfield Corey announces that money “is the romance, the poetry of our age.” Lily Bart, the heroine of Edith Wharton’s The House of Mirth (1905), declares that she “must have a great deal of money” to be happy. City streets, sidewalks, and parks provided countless scenes of real life to depict on canvas and in words. Novelist Henry James said that the daily urban scene unleashed a “flood of the real” to study and portray. John Sloan, a

Cultural Life  863


 Stag at Sharkey’s (1909) New York painter George Bellows witnessed such fierce boxing matches across the street from his studio, at the saloon of retired heavyweight boxer “Sailor” Sharkey. Bellows is one of the most famous artists from the Ashcan School, which was committed to capturing the gritty reality of the urban scene.

 New York City painter, chose his subjects by spying on people from his Manhattan studio. He confided in his diary that he was addicted to “watching every bit of human life” through his windows and along the sidewalks. Others shared Sloan’s “spectatorial” sensibility. “My favorite pastime,” writer Theodore Dreiser remembered, “was to walk the city streets and view the lives and activities of others.” In his influential novel Sister Carrie (1900), Carrie Meeber uses her “gift of observation” to view strangers through the open windows of shops, offices, and factories, imagining what “they deal with, how they labored, to what end it all came.” The realists’ emphasis on closely observing everyday life grew out of the scientific spirit. Just as scientists observed visible and verifiable facts and transformed them into knowledge, cultural realists studied the world around them and expressed it in art and literature. Like a gust of fresh air, they made Americans aware of the significance of their everyday surroundings, in all their beauty and ugliness.

 864  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

Gilded Age Politics
 The Gilded Age was an era of more political corruption than political innovation. In 1879, Woodrow Wilson, then a young college graduate, described the political system as having “no leaders, no principles.” The real movers and shakers of the Gilded Age were not the men in the White House or Congress but the owners of giant corporations. These “captains of industry” regularly used their wealth to “buy” elections and favors at all levels of government. Jay Gould, one of the most aggressive railroad tycoons, admitted that he elected “the [New York] legislature with my own money.” “Special interests,” businesses that bought favors from government officials, dominated Gilded Age politics. By the end of the nineteenth century, however, new movements and parties were pushing to reform the excesses and injustices created by a political system that had grown corrupt in its efforts to support the “special interests” promoted by Big Business.

 local politics and party loyalties

 Perhaps the most important feature of Gilded Age politics was its local focus. Most political activity occurred at the state and local levels. Unlike today, the federal government was an insignificant force in the daily lives of most citizens, in part because it was so small. In 1871, the entire federal civilian workforce totaled 51,000 (most of them postal workers), of whom only 6,000 actually worked in Washington, D.C. Not until the twentieth century did the importance of the federal government begin to surpass that of local and state governments. Americans during the Gilded Age were intensely loyal to their political party, which they joined as much for the fellowship and networking connections as for its positions on issues. Unlike today, party members paid dues to join, and party leaders regularly demanded large campaign contributions from the captains of industry and finance. Collis Huntington, a California railroad tycoon, admitted that bribery in the form of campaign contributions was expected: “If you have to pay money to have the right thing done, then it is only just and fair to do it.” Roscoe Conkling, a powerful Republican senator from New York, was equally candid: “Of course, we do rotten things in New York. . . . ​Politics is a rotten business.” Democrat Horatio Seymour, a presidential candidate in 1868, explained that “our people want men in office who will not steal, but who will not interfere with those who do.” In cities crowded with new immigrant voters, politics was usually controlled by “rings”—small groups who shaped policy and managed the nomination and election of candidates. Each ring typically had a powerful “boss” who used his “machine”—a network of neighborhood activists and ­officials—​­to govern.

Gilded Age Politics  865


 Colorful, ­larger-​­than-​­life figures such as New York City’s William “Boss” Tweed shamelessly ruled, plundered, and occasionally improved municipal government, often through dishonest means and frequent bribes. Until his arrest in 1871 and his conviction in 1873, Tweed used the Tammany Hall ring to dominate the nation’s largest city. The Tammany Hall machine doled out contracts to business allies and jobs to political supporters. In the late 1870s one of every twelve New York men worked for the city government. The various city rings and bosses were William “Boss” Tweed A ­larger-​­than-​ often corrupt, but they did bring struc- ­life political boss was New York City’s ture, stability, and services to rapidly William “Boss” Tweed, whose powerful connections made “no prison big growing i­ nner-​­city communities, many enough to hold the Boss.” of them composed of immigrants newly arrived from Ireland, Germany, and, increasingly, from southern and eastern Europe. The party in power expected the government employees it appointed to become campaign workers and to do the bidding of party bosses. Those bosses in “­smoke-​­filled back rooms” often decided who the candidates would be and commanded loyalty and obedience by rewarding and punishing their party members. They helped settle local disputes, provided aid for the poor, and distributed government jobs and contracts to loyal followers and corporate donors through the patronage system. President Ulysses S. Grant’s secretary told a Republican party boss that he hoped “you will distribute the patronage in such a manner as will help the Administration.” Throughout the Gilded Age, almost every government ­job—​­local, state, and ­federal—​­was subject to the latest election results. As a Democratic party official in New York City admitted, “You can’t keep a [political] organization together without patronage. Men ain’t in politics for nothin’. They want to get somethin’ out of it.” The jobs given to party loyalists covered a wide range, from cabinet posts to courthouse clerk positions. The largest single source of political jobs was the postal service, which accounted for half of all federal civilian employees. Those who were awarded government jobs were expected to contribute a percentage of their salary to the political party.

 866  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 The corruption associated with the patronage system eventually drew criticism from “civil service reformers,” who pushed through legislation designed to limit such patronage and introduced a “merit system” for government employment based on ability and experience.

 national politics

 Several factors gave national politics during the Gilded Age its distinctive texture. First in importance was the close division between Republicans and Democrats in Congress. Because neither party was dominant after the revival of the national Democratic party in 1876, they both avoided controversial issues or bold initiatives for fear of losing a close election. Yet, paradoxically, voter intensity at all levels peaked during the Gilded Age at the same time that many divisive issues were suppressed or ignored. Voter turnout was commonly about 70 to 80 percent. (By contrast, the turnout for the 2012 U.S. presidential election was 58 percent.) During the Gilded Age, most voters cast their ballots for the same party year after year. Party loyalty was often an emotional choice. In the 1870s and 1880s, for example, people continued to fight the Civil War during political campaigns. Republican candidates regularly “waved the bloody shirt,” accusing Democrats of having caused “secession and civil war,” while Republicans took credit for abolishing slavery and saving the Union. Democrats, especially in the South, where they monopolized political power after 1877, responded by reminding voters that they stood for limited government, states’ rights, and white supremacy. Republicans tended to favor high tariffs on imports, but many Democrats also supported tariffs if they benefited the dominant businesses in their districts or states. Third parties, such as the Greenbackers, Populists, and Prohibitionists, appealed to specific interests and issues, such as currency inflation, railroad regulations, or legislation to restrict alcohol consumption. Party loyalties reflected religious, ethnic, and geographic divisions. After the Civil War, the Republican party remained strongest in New England, upstate New York, Pennsylvania, Ohio, and the Midwest. Republicans tended to be Protestants of English or Scandinavian descent. As the party of Abraham Lincoln (the “Great Emancipator”) and Ulysses S. Grant, Republicans could also rely upon the votes of African Americans in the South (until their right to vote was taken away) and the support of a large bloc of Union veterans of the Civil War, who were organized into a powerful national interest group called the Grand Army of the Republic. The Democrats were a more diverse coalition of conservative southern whites, northern Catholics of German or Irish Catholic backgrounds, and others repelled by the Republicans’ claim to be the “party of morality.” As one

Gilded Age Politics  867


 Chicago Democrat explained, “A Republican is a man who wants you t’ go t’ church every Sunday. A Democrat says if a man wants to have a glass of beer on Sunday he can have it.” During the 1880s, Protestant Republicans infuriated many immigrants and Catholics of Irish, Italian, or German background by promoting efforts to limit or prohibit the consumption of alcoholic beverages. They also pushed for nativist policies designed to restrict immigration and the employment of foreigners. Among the immigrants crowded into the growing cities were many Irish, Germans, and Italians, all of whom had brought their robust drinking traditions with them into their new country. The mostly rural Protestant Republicans considered saloons the central social evil around which all others revolved, and they associated these evils with the ethnic groups that frequented saloons. Carrie Nation, the most colorful member of the Women’s Christian Temperance Union (WCTU), became nationally known for attacking saloons with a hatchet. Saloons, she argued, stripped a married woman of everything by

 “‘Coming Out’ – For Harrison” This 1888 cartoon depicts efforts by employers to force the working class to vote for the Republican party ticket, including presidential nominee Benjamin Harrison.

 868  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 turning working men into alcoholics, as had happened with Nation’s first husband: “Her husband is torn from her, she is robbed of her sons, her home, her food, and her virtue.” Between 1869 and 1913, from the first term of Ulysses S. Grant through the election of William Howard Taft, Republicans monopolized the White House except for two nonconsecutive terms of New York Democrat Grover Cleveland. Otherwise, national politics was remarkably balanced. Between 1872 and 1896, no president won a majority of the popular vote. In each of those presidential elections, sixteen states invariably voted Republican and fourteen, including every southern state, voted Democratic, leaving six “swing” states to determine the outcome. Two of those states, New York and Ohio, decided the election of eight presidents from 1872 to 1908. Presidents during the Gilded Age, both Republican and Democrat, deferred to their party leaders in the Senate and House of Representatives. They believed that Congress, not the White House, should formulate major policies that the president would implement. As Senator John Sherman of Ohio stressed, “the President should merely obey and enforce the law” as laid out by Congress.

Hayes to Harrison
 Both Republicans and Democrats had their share of officials willing to buy and sell government jobs or legislative votes. Yet as early as the 1870s, in response to the corruption uncovered in the Grant administration, each party developed factions promoting honesty in government. The struggle for “clean” government became one of the foremost issues of the Gilded Age.

Hayes and Civil Service Reform
 President Rutherford B. Hayes brought to the White House in 1877 both a lingering controversy over the disputed election results (critics called him “His Fraudulency” or “His Accidency”) and an uprightness that was in sharp contrast to the barely concealed graft of the Grant era. Hayes appointed a Democrat as postmaster general in an effort to clean up an office infamous for trading jobs for political favors. The son of an Ohio farmer, Hayes was wounded four times in the Civil War. He went on to serve in Congress and as governor of Ohio. Honest and conservative, he was, said a Republican journalist, a “­third-​­rate nonentity” whose only virtue was that he was “obnoxious to no one.” Hayes had been the compromise presidential nominee of two factions fighting for control of the Republican party, the s­o-​­called Stalwarts and

Hayes to Harrison  869


 “The Bosses of the Senate” This 1889 cartoon bitingly portrays the period’s corrupt alliance between big business and legislators.

 ­ alf-​­Breeds, led, respectively, by Senators Roscoe Conkling of New York and H James G. Blaine of Maine. The Stalwarts had been “stalwart” in their support of President Grant during the furor over the misdeeds of his cabinet members. Further, they had mastered the patronage system (spoils system) of distributing political jobs to party loyalists. The ­Half-​­Breeds supposedly were only half loyal to Grant and half committed to reform of the spoils system. But in the end, the two factions existed primarily to advance the careers of Conkling and Blaine, who detested each other. To his credit, President Hayes tried to stay above the petty bickering. He joined the growing public outrage over corruption, admitting that his party “must mend its ways” by focusing on Republican principles rather than fighting over the spoils of office. “He serves his party best who serves his country best,” Hayes declared. It was time “for civil service [government jobs] reform.” He appointed a committee to consider a “merit system” for hiring government employees, as used in some European countries. In a dramatic gesture, Hayes also fired Chester A. Arthur, a Stalwart Republican who ran the New York Customs House, because Arthur had abused the patronage system in ways, according to Hayes, that promoted “ignorance, inefficiency, and corruption.” Hayes’s commitment to cleaning up politics enraged Republican leaders. In 1879, Ohio congressman James Garfield warned Hayes that “if he wishes to hold any influence” with fellow Republicans, he “must abandon some of

 870  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 his notions of Civil Service reform.” For his part, Hayes confessed that he had little hope of success because he was “opposed by . . . ​the most powerful men in my party.” On economic issues, Hayes held to a conservative line that would guide his ­successors—​­from both p ­ arties—​­for the rest of the century. His answer to demands for expansion of the nation’s money supply (which would become one of the leading issues of the late nineteenth century) was a resounding no: he vetoed the B ­ land-​­Allison Act (1878), a bipartisan effort to increase the supply of silver coins. (More money in circulation was generally believed to raise farm prices and help those trying to pay off debts.) Hayes believed only in “hard money”—gold coins. When the ­Democrat-​­controlled Congress convinced many Republicans to help overturn Hayes’s veto, the president confided in his diary that he had become a president without a party. In 1879, with a year still left in his term, Hayes was ready to leave the White House. “I am now in my last year of the Presidency,” he wrote a friend, “and look forward to its close as a schoolboy longs for the coming vacation.”

Garfield, Arthur, and the Pendleton Act
 With Hayes choosing not to pursue a second term, the Republican presidential nomination in 1880 was up for grabs. Former president Grant wanted the nomination but was unwilling to campaign for it. In the end, the Stalwarts and ­Half-​­Breeds were forced to select a compromise candidate, Congressman James A. Garfield. Garfield had been a minister, a lawyer, and a college president before serving in the Civil War as a Union army general. In an effort to please the Stalwarts and also win the crucial swing state of New York, the Republicans named Chester A. Arthur, whom Hayes had fired as head of the New York Customs House as their candidate for vice president. The Democrats, even more divided than the Republicans, selected Winfield Scott Hancock, a retired Union general who had distinguished himself at the Battle of Gettysburg but had done little since. In large part, Hancock was chosen to help deflect the Republicans’ “­bloody-​­shirt” attacks on Democrats as the party of the Confederacy. Yet Hancock undermined that effort by supporting southern efforts to strip blacks of voting rights. In an election marked by widespread bribery, Garfield eked out a p ­ opular-​­vote plurality of only 39,000, or 48.5 percent. He won a more comfortable margin of 214 to 155 in the electoral college. Republicans took control of Congress as well. Embedded in the voting, however, was a worrisome pattern: the Democrats won all the southern states, and the Republicans won all the northern

Hayes to Harrison  871


 states. Politically, the Civil War was not over. Moreover, in future presidential elections, if the Republicans lost New York State, they would lose the White House. Securing the nation’s m ­ ost-​­populous state thus became central to Republican strategy.

 a presidency cut short

 In his inaugural address, President Garfield gave an impassioned defense of civil rights, arguing that the “elevation of the negro race from slavery to the full rights of citizenship is the most important political change we have known since the adoption of the Constitution of 1787.” The end of slavery, he said, “has added immensely to the moral and industrial forces of our people. It has liberated the master as well as the slave from a relation which wronged and enfeebled both.” But he also confirmed that the Republicans had ended efforts to reconstruct the former Confederacy. Southern blacks were on their own now; they had been “surrendered to their own guardianship.” In the continuing feud between the ­Half-​­Breed and Stalwart factions of the Republican party, Garfield chose the ­Half-​­Breeds. He appointed James G. Blaine as secretary of state over the objection of Ulysses S. Grant, leading the former president to tell reporters that Garfield “is a man without backbone. A man of fine ability but lacking stamina. He wants to please everybody.” Garfield would have no time to prove himself as president, however. On July 2, 1881, after only four months in office, he was walking through the Washington, D.C., railroad station, headed to a vacation in Vermont, when he was shot in the arm and back by Charles Guiteau, a former Republican who had been turned down for a federal job. As a policeman wrestled the assassin to the ground, Guiteau shouted: “Yes! I have killed Garfield! [Chester] Arthur is President of the United States. I am a Stalwart!”—a declaration that would eventually destroy the Stalwart wing of the Republican party. On September 19, after ­seventy-​­nine days, Garfield died of complications resulting from inept medical care. During a sensational t­en-​­week trial, Guiteau said that God had ordered him to kill the president. The jury refused to believe that he was insane and pronounced him guilty of murder. On June 30, 1882, Guiteau was hanged; an autopsy revealed that his brain was diseased.

 the civil service commission

 In their grief over Garfield’s death, Americans blamed Roscoe Conkling and the Stalwart Republicans for inciting Guiteau. One New York newspaper headline read: “murdered by the spoils system!” People saw little potential in the new president, Chester A. Arthur, who had been Roscoe Conkling’s trusted lieutenant. Grant wrote an a­ ssociate that

 872  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 he did not “expect much from this administration.” Yet Arthur surprised most political observers by distancing himself from Conkling and the Stalwarts and becoming a civil service reformer. Throughout his presidency, he kept a promise not to remove any federal office holder purely for political reasons. He also made cabinet appointments based on merit rather than partisanship. One of Arthur’s former New York associates, a Stalwart, grumbled that “he has done less for us than Garfield, or even Hayes.” Very little is known about President Arthur. Just before he died, he had all of his official papers and correspondence burned. Why he did so remains a mystery. Unlike most presidents, there is no library or museum dedicated to Arthur’s career. He wanted obscurity and he got it. In 1883, momentum against the spoils system generated by Garfield’s assassination enabled George H. Pendleton, a Democratic senator from Ohio, to convince Congress to establish a Civil Service Commission, the first federal regulatory agency. Because of the Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act, at least 15 percent of federal jobs would now be filled on the basis of competitive tests (the “merit system”) rather than political favoritism. In addition, federal employees running for office were prohibited from receiving political contributions from other government workers. The Pendleton Act was a limited first step in cleaning up the patronage process. It was sorely needed, in part because the federal government was expanding rapidly. By 1901, there would be 256,000 federal employees, five times the number in 1871. A growing number of these federal workers were women, who by 1890 held a third of the government’s clerical jobs.

The Campaign of 1884
 Chester Arthur’s efforts to clean up the spoils system might have attracted voters, but they did not please Republican leaders. So in 1884 the Republicans dumped the ailing Arthur (he had contracted a kidney disease) and chose as their nominee James Gillespie Blaine of Maine, the handsome, colorful secretary of state, former senator, and longtime leader of the ­Half-​­Breeds. Blaine inspired the party faithful with his electrifying speeches, and he knew how to wheel and deal in the backrooms. One critic charged that Blaine “wallowed in spoils like a rhinoceros in an African pool.” Newspapers soon uncovered evidence of his corruption in the ­so-​­called Mulligan letters, which revealed that, as Speaker of the House, Blaine had secretly sold his votes on measures favorable to a railroad corporation. Nobody proved that he had committed any crimes, but the circumstantial evidence was powerful: his senatorial

Hayes to Harrison  873


 salary alone could not have built either his mansion in Washington, D.C., nor his palatial home in Augusta, Maine. During the presidential campaign, more embarrassing letters surfaced linking Blaine to shady deal making. In one of them, Blaine told the recipient: “Burn this letter!” For the reform element of the Republican party, this was too much, and many ­independent-​­minded Republicans refused to endorse Blaine’s candidacy. “We are Republicans but we are not slaves,” said one of the independents. He insisted that the party of Lincoln must recommit itself to “retrenchment, purity Senator James Gillespie Blaine of and reform.” Party regulars scorned Maine The Republican presidential such critics as “­goo-​­goos”—the “­good-​ candidate in 1884. ­government” crowd who were outraged by the corrupting influence of money in politics. The editor of a New York newspaper jokingly called the ­anti-​­Blaine Republicans Mugwumps, after an Algonquian Indian word meaning “big chief.” The Mugwumps, a s­ elf-​­appointed group of reformers dedicated to promoting honest government, saw the election as a “moral rather than political” contest. Centered in the large cities and major universities of the northeast, the Mugwumps were mostly professors, editors, and writers who included in their number the most famous American of the time, writer and humorist Mark Twain. Like the Liberal Republicans before them, the Mugwumps sought to reform the patronage system by declaring that all federal jobs would be filled solely on the basis of merit. Their break with the Republican party over patronage testified to the depth of their convictions. The rise of the Mugwumps, as well as growing national concerns about political corruption, prompted the Democrats to nominate New Yorker Grover Cleveland. Cleveland had first attracted national attention in 1881, when he was elected mayor of Buffalo on an ­anti-​­corruption platform. He was elected governor of New York in 1882, and he continued to build a reform record by fighting New York City’s corrupt Tammany Hall ring. As mayor and as governor, he repeatedly vetoed bills that he felt served private interests at the expense of the public good. He supported civil service reform, opposed expanding the money supply, and preferred free trade to high tariffs.

 874  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 Although Cleveland was known for his honesty and integrity, he was hurt by two personal issues: the discovery that he had paid for a substitute to take his place in the Union army during the Civil War, and a juicy sex scandal that erupted when a Buffalo newspaper revealed that Cleveland, a bachelor, had befriended an attractive widow named Maria Halpin, who named him the father of her baby born in 1874. Cleveland had discreetly provided financial support for the child. The escapades of Blaine and Cleveland inspired some of the most colorful battle cries in political history: “Blaine, Blaine, James G. Blaine, the continental liar from the state of Maine,” Democrats chanted. Republicans countered with “Ma, ma, where’s my pa?” Democrats also paraded through the streets chanting, “Burn this letter!” Near the end of the nasty campaign, Blaine and his supporters committed two fateful blunders in the crucial state of New York. The first occurred at New York City’s fashionable Delmonico’s restaurant, where Blaine went to a private dinner with 200 of the nation’s wealthiest business leaders to ask them to help finance his campaign. Accounts of the unseemly event appeared in the newspapers for days afterward. One headline blared: “Blaine Hobnobbing with the Mighty Money Kings!” The article explained that the banquet was intended to collect contributions for a “Republican corruption fund.” Blaine’s second blunder occurred when a Protestant minister visiting Republican headquarters in New York referred to the Democrats as the party of “rum, Romanism, and rebellion [the Confederacy].” Blaine, who was present, let pass the implied insult to ­Catholics—​­a fatal oversight, since he had cultivated Irish American support with his a­ nti-​­English talk and repeated references to his mother being a Catholic. Democrats claimed that Blaine was, at heart, a­ nti-​­Irish and ­anti-​­Catholic. The two incidents may have tipped the 1884 presidential election. The elect­ oral vote was 219 to 182 in Cleveland’s favor, but the popular vote ran far closer: Cleveland’s plurality was fewer than 30,000 votes out of 10 million cast. Grover Cleveland As president, Cleveland won New York by only 1,149 Cleveland made the issue of tariff reform votes out of 1,167,169 cast. At long last, a central to the politics of the late 1880s. Democrat was back in the White House.

Hayes to Harrison  875


 Cleveland’s Reform Efforts During his first few months in office, President Cleveland struggled to keep Democratic leaders from reviving the self-serving patronage system. In a letter to a friend, the new president reported that he was living in a “nightmare,” that “dreadful, damnable, ­office-​­seeking hangs over me and surrounds me” and that it made him “feel like resigning.” Democratic newspapers heaped scorn on him for refusing to award federal jobs to his supporters. One accused Cleveland of “ingratitude” toward those who had “delivered the vote.” Despite the president’s best efforts, about t­wo-​­thirds of the 120,000 federal jobs went to Democrats as patronage during his administration. Cleveland was an o ­ ld-​­style Democrat who believed in minimal government activity. During his first term, he vetoed over 400 acts of Congress, more than twice as many as all previous presidents combined. In 1887, he illustrated his “do as little as possible” philosophy by vetoing a congressional effort to provide desperate Texas farmers with seeds in the aftermath of a terrible drought. “Though the people support the government, the government should not support the people,” Cleveland asserted.

 railroad regulation

 For all of his commitment to limited government intervention, President Cleveland urged Congress to adopt an important new policy: federal regulation of the rates charged by interstate railroads (those whose tracks crossed state lines) to ship goods, crops, or livestock. He believed that railroads were charging unfairly high freight rates. States had adopted laws regulating railroads since the late 1860s, but in 1886 the Supreme Court declared in Wabash, St. Louis, and Pacific Railroad Company v. Illinois that no state could regulate the rates charged by railroads engaged in interstate traffic. Because most railroads crossed state lines, Cleveland urged Congress to close the loophole. Congress followed through, and in 1887, Cleveland signed an act creating the Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC), the first federal regulatory agency. The law empowered the ICC’s five members to ensure that railroad freight rates were “reasonable and just.” But one senator called the new agency “a delusion and a sham” because its members tended to be former railroad executives. Moreover, the commission’s actual powers proved to be weak when challenged in the courts by railroads. Over time, the ICC came to be ignored, and the railroads continued to charge high rates while making secret pricing deals with large shippers.

 tariff reform and the election of 1888

President
 Cleveland’s most dramatic challenge to Big Business focused on tariff reform.

 876  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 During the late nineteenth century, the government’s ­high-​­tariff policies, shaped largely by the Republican party, had favored American manufacturers by effectively shutting out foreign imports, thereby enabling U.S. corporations to dominate the marketplace and charge higher prices for their products. Tariffs on some 4,000 imported items had also brought in more revenue from foreign manufacturers than the federal government spent. As a result, the tariff revenues were producing an annual government surplus, which proved to Cleveland and the Democrats that the rates were too high. In 1887, Cleveland argued that Congress should reduce both the tariff rates (“the vicious, inequitable and illogical source of unnecessary ­ ­taxation . . . [and] a burden upon the poor”) and the number of imported goods subject to tariffs to enable European companies to compete in the American marketplace. His outspoken stance set the stage for his reelection campaign in 1888. To oppose Cleveland, the Republicans, now calling themselves the GOP (Grand Old Party) to emphasize their longevity, turned to the obscure Benjamin Harrison, a Civil War veteran whose greatest attributes were his availability and the fact that he was from Indiana, a pivotal state in presidential elections. The grandson of President William Henry Harrison, he had a modest political record; he had lost a race for governor and had served one term in the U.S. Senate (1881–1887). In the eyes of the party leadership, however, Harrison had the most important attribute: he would do as he was told. The Republicans accepted Cleveland’s challenge to make tariffs the chief issue in the campaign. They enjoyed a huge advantage in campaign funding, as business executives contributed generously to their campaign. Still, the outcome was incredibly close. Cleveland won the popular vote by the thinnest of ­margins—​­5,540,329 to 5,439,853—but Harrison carried crucial New York State and the electoral college by 233 to 168. “Providence,” said the new president, “has given us the victory.” Matthew Quay, the powerful Republican boss of Pennsylvania who managed Harrison’s campaign, knew better. Harrison, he muttered, “ought to know that Providence hadn’t a damned thing to do with it! [A] number of men were compelled to approach the penitentiary to make him President.” Quay’s decision to distribute campaign money in key states and to promise federal jobs to loyalists also helped Republicans gain control of the House and the Senate. As the Republicans prepared for the inauguration, Frank Leslie’s Illustrated Newspaper, ­co-​­edited by Harrison’s son Russell, made clear the new president’s priorities: “This is to be a businessman’s Administration,” and “businessmen will be thoroughly well content with it.”

Hayes to Harrison  877


Republican Activism Under Harrison
 Harrison owed a heavy debt to Civil War veterans, whose votes had been critical to his e­ lection, and he paid it by signing the Dependent Pension Act. As a result, the number of Union war veterans (and their family members) receiving federal pensions almost doubled between 1889 and 1893. The Republicans also took advantage of their control of Congress to pass a cluster of significant legislation in 1890: the Sherman A ­ nti-​­Trust Act, the Sherman Silver Purchase Act, the McKinley Tariff Act, and the admission of Idaho and Wyoming as new states, which followed the admission of North and South Dakota, Montana, and Washington in 1889. The Sherman ­Anti-​­Trust Act, named for Ohio senator John Sherman, prohibited powerful corporations from “conspiring” to establish monopolies or “restrain trade” in their industries. It made the United States the first nation in the world to outlaw monopolistic business practices. Though badly needed, the Sherman A ­ nti-​­Trust Act was a toothless hoax intended to make it appear that Congress was clamping down on the gigantic corporations dominating more and more industries. That it passed without any opposition suggested that the bill was mostly for show. Critics called it the “Swiss Cheese Act” because it had so many holes in its language. As the New York Times recognized in 1890, the “­so-​­called ­Anti-​­Trust law” was passed “to deceive the people” and prepare the way for a much higher tariff bill. Senator Sherman, the article added, supported this “humbug” of a law so that party spokesmen “might say ‘Behold! We have attacked the trusts. The Republican Party is the enemy of all such rings.’” The Sherman ­Anti-​­Trust Act was rarely enforced, in large part because of its vague definitions of “trusts” and “monopolies.” From 1890 to 1901, only eighteen lawsuits were instituted, four of which were filed against labor unions A ­billion-​­dollar hole In an attack on rather than corporations, claiming that Benjamin Harrison’s spending policies, striking workers were “conspiring” to Harrison is shown pouring Cleveland’s huge surplus down a hole. “restrain trade.”

 878  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

The Sherman Silver Purchase Act
 (1890), which required the Treasury to purchase 4.5 million ounces of silver each month to convert into dollar coins, was an effort by the Republicans to please the new western states with numerous silver mines. The bill’s sponsor, Senator John Sherman, admitted that he proposed the bill only to defuse cries for the “unlimited coinage” of silver. “I voted for it,” he confessed, “but the day it became law I was ready to repeal it.” The Sherman act helped set the stage for the currency issue to eclipse all others during the financial panic that would sweep the country in 1893. As for tariff policy, Republicans viewed their victory as a mandate to reward the support of large corporations by raising tariff rates even higher. “King of the World” Reformers Piloted through Congress by Ohio targeted the growing power of representative William McKinley, the monopolies, such as that of John D. Rockefeller’s Standard Oil. McKinley Tariff Act of 1890 raised duties (taxes) on imported manufactured goods to their highest level ever and added many agricultural products to the tariff list to appease farmers. Its passage encouraged many businesses to raise prices, because their European competitors were now effectively shut out of the U.S. market. The New York Times expressed the indignation of many voters when it charged in a huge headline: “mckinley’s pickpockets [were] paying a party debt” to large corporate donors by passing the new tariff bill. The Republican efforts to reward Big Business backfired, however. In the November 1890 congressional elections, Democrats won big, regaining control of the House by a three to one margin. William McKinley, who had sponsored the tariff bill, lost his seat (although the following year he would be elected Ohio’s governor). In the Senate, the Republican majority was reduced to four. Republicans were “astounded and dazed” by the shellacking in the election. Even more worrisome was the emergence of the Populists, a new political party representing disgruntled farmers and wage laborers. Revolution was in the air.

Farmers and the “Money Problem”  879


Farmers and the “Money Problem”
 More than tariffs, trusts, and efforts to clean up political corruption, national politics during the Gilded Age was preoccupied with monetary issues. The nation’s money supply had not grown along with the expanding economy. From 1865 to 1890, the amount of money in circulation (both coins and paper currency) actually decreased about 10 percent. Such currency deflation raised the cost of borrowing money as the shrinking money supply enabled lenders to hike interest rates on loans. ­Creditors—​ ­bankers and others who loaned m ­ oney—​­supported a “sound money” policy limiting the currency supply as a means of increasing their profits. By contrast, farmers, ranchers, miners, and others who had to borrow money to make ends meet claimed that the “sound money” policy lowered prices for their crops and herds and drove them deeper into debt. Farmers in the Midwest, Great Plains, and South, and miners in the West, demanded more paper money and the increased coinage of silver, which would inflate the currency supply, raise commodity prices, and provide them with more income. In 1876, several farm organizations across the nation had organized the independent “Greenback” party to promote the benefits of paper money over gold and silver coins; “Greenbackers” won fifteen seats in Congress in 1878, illustrating the significance of currency issues to voters. Although the Greenback party died out, the demands for increasing the money supply survived. All six western states admitted to the Union in 1889 and 1890 had substantial silver mines, and their new congressional ­delegations—​­largely ­Republican—​ ­wanted the federal government to buy more silver for minting as coins.

 agricultural unrest

 The 1890 congressional elections revealed a ­deep-​­seated unrest in the farming communities of the South, on the plains of Kansas and Nebraska, and in the mining towns of the Rocky Mountain region. Over the previous twenty years, corn prices had fallen by a third, wheat by more than half, cotton by t­ wo-​­thirds. The drastic decline in prices was caused by overproduction and growing international competition in world food markets. The vast new lands brought under cultivation in the plains as a result of the extension of rail lines and the use of new farm machinery poured an e­ ver-​ ­increasing supply of grains into world markets, driving prices down. Meanwhile, farmers in the South and West had become increasingly indebted to local banks or merchants who loaned them money at high interest rates to buy seed, fertilizer, tools, and other supplies. As prices for their crops dropped, however, so did the income the farmers received, thus preventing them from paying their debts on time.

 880  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 In response, most farmers had no choice but to grow even more wheat, cotton, or corn, but the increased supply pushed down prices and incomes even further. High tariffs on imported goods also hurt farmers because they allowed U.S. companies to raise the prices of manufactured goods needed by farm families. Besides bankers, merchants, and high tariffs, struggling farmers blamed the railroads, warehouse owners, and food ­processors—​­the ­so-​­called m ­ iddlemen—​ ­who helped get crops and livestock to market. Farmers especially resented that railroads, most of which had a monopoly over the shipping of grains and animals, charged such high rates to ship agricultural products. At the same time that farm income was dropping, successive years of parched summers and bitterly cold winters had destroyed harvests in many states. “This season is without parallel in this part of the country,” reported the editor of a Nebraska agricultural journal in 1891. “The hot winds burned up the entire crop, leaving thousands of families wholly destitute” and vulnerable to the “money loaners and sharks” charging criminal rates of interest. In a slap at the cutthroat capitalism justified by the heartless logic of social Darwinism, the editor dismissed the popular slogan “survival of the fittest” as a “satanic creed” that means “slavery to millions.” In ­drought-​­devastated Kansas in 1890, Populists won five congressional seats from Republicans. In early 1891, the newly elected Populists and Democrats took control of Congress just as an acute economic crisis appeared on the horizon: farmers’ debts were mounting as crop prices continued to fall.

 the granger movement

When the Department of Agriculture
 sent Oliver H. Kelley on a tour of the South in 1866, he was struck by the social isolation of people living on small farms. To address the problem, Kelley helped found the National Grange of the Patrons of Husbandry, better known as the Grange (an old word for places where crops were stored). The Grange grew quickly, reaching a membership of 858,000 men and women by 1875. It started out offering social events and educational programs for farmers and their families, but as it grew, it began to promote “cooperatives” where farmers could join together to store and sell their crops to avoid the high fees charged by brokers and other middlemen. In five Midwest states, Grange chapters persuaded legislatures to pass “Granger laws” to regulate the prices charged by railroads and grain warehouses (called “elevators”). Railroad and warehouse owners challenged the laws, but in Munn v. Illinois (1877), the Supreme Court ruled that states had the right to regulate property that operated in the public interest. Nine years later, however, the Court threw out the Munn ruling, finding in

Farmers and the “Money Problem”  881


 “I Feed You All!” (1875) The farmer is the cornerstone of American society, according to this ­Granger-​­inspired poster. Without the food he produces, no man in any occupation can do his ­job—​­including the railroad magnate (left) and warehouse owners who try to exploit him.

 Wabash v. Illinois that only Congress could regulate industries involved in interstate commerce.

 farmers’ alliances

 The Granger movement failed to address the foremost concerns of struggling farmers: declining crop prices and the inadequate amount of money in circulation. As a result, people shifted their allegiance to a new organization called the Farmers’ Alliance. Like the Grange, the Farmers’ Alliances organized social and recreational activities for small farmers and their families while also emphasizing political action and economic cooperation to address the hardships caused by chronic indebtedness, declining crop prices, and droughts. Emerging first in Texas, the Alliance movement swept across the South, Kansas, Nebraska, and the Dakotas. In 1886, a white minister in Texas responded to the appeals of African American farmers by organizing the Colored Farmers’ National Alliance. By 1890, the white Alliance movement

 882  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 had about 1.5 million members, and the Colored Farmers’ National Alliance claimed more than 1 million members. Most white Alliance members refused to integrate their efforts with blacks, not only because of racism but also because most black farmers were tenants and sharecroppers rather than landowners. Although many landless farmers supported the Alliances, the majority of members were landowners who sold their crops in the marketplace. In the states west of the Mississippi River, political activism intensified after record blizzards in 1887, which killed most of the cattle and hogs across the northern plains, and a prolonged drought two years later that destroyed millions of acres of corn, wheat, and oats. Distressed farmers lashed out against what they considered to be a powerful conspiracy of eastern financial and industrial interests, which they variously called “monopolies,” “the money power,” or “Wall Street.” As William Jennings Bryan, a Democratic congressman from Nebraska, explained: “We simply say to the East: take your hands out of our pockets and keep them out.” The Alliances called for the federal government to take ownership of the railroads and create an income tax on wealthy Americans. They also organized economic “cooperatives” to bind together their collective strength. In 1887, Charles W. Macune, the Southern Alliance president, explained that “the Alliance is the people and the people are together.” He exhorted Texas farmers to create their own Alliance Exchange to free themselves from dependence on commercial warehouses, grain elevators, food processors, and banks. Members of the Alliance Exchange would act collectively, pooling their resources to borrow money from banks and purchase their goods and supplies from a new corporation created by the Alliance in Dallas. The exchange would also build warehouses to store and market members’ crops. With these crops as collateral, members would receive cash loans to buy household goods and agricultural supplies. Once the farmers sold their crops, they would pay back the loans provided by the Alliance warehouse. This cooperative scheme collapsed when Texas banks refused to accept paper money. Undaunted, Alliance members then focused on what Macune called a “subtreasury plan,” whereby farmers would store their crops in ­government-​­run warehouses and obtain cash loans for up to 80 percent of the crops’ value. This would free them from their traditional dependence on banks that charged high interest rates. Besides providing immediate credit, the subtreasury plan would allow farmers the option of storing a crop in hopes of getting a better price later. The plan would also promote inflation of the money supply because the loans to farmers would be made in new paper money. Monetary inflation was popular with farmers because it allowed them to repay their debts with cheaper money.

Farmers and the “Money Problem”  883


 Despite the strong support from farmers, however, Congress nixed the subtreasury plan in 1890. Its defeat, as well as setbacks to other Alliance proposals, convinced many farm leaders that they needed more political power to secure the reforms necessary to save the agricultural sector: railroad regulation, currency inflation, state departments of agriculture, ­anti-​­trust laws, and more accessible ­farm-​­based credit (loans). About o ­ ne-​­fourth of Alliance members were women. The Alliance welcomed rural women and men over sixteen years of age who displayed a “good moral character,” believed in God, and demonstrated “industrious habits.” The slogan of the Southern Alliance was “equal rights to all, special privileges to none.” A North Carolina woman relished the “grand opportunities” the Alliance provided women, allowing them to emerge from household drudgeries. “Drudgery, fashion, and gossip,” she declared, “are no longer the bounds of woman’s sphere.” One Alliance publication made the point explicitly: “The Alliance has come to redeem woman from her enslaved condition, and place her in her proper sphere.” The number of women in the movement grew ­rapidly, and many assumed key leadership roles in the “grand army of reform.”

 new third parties

 The Alliances called for ­third-​­party political action to address their concerns. In 1890, farm activists in Colorado joined with miners and railroad workers to form the Independent party, and Nebraska farmers formed the People’s Independent party. Leonidas Polk, a former Confederate general who was the head of the North Carolina Alliance, traveled to Kansas and was so impressed by the size of the ­open-​­air farm rallies that he declared that farmers across the nation “have risen up and inaugurated a movement such as the world has never seen.” In the South, the Alliance movement forced Democrats to nominate ­candidates who supported its farm program and succeeded in electing four of them as governors, ­forty-​­four as congressmen, and several as U.S. senators, as well as seven p ­ ro-​­Alliance state legislatures. Among the most respected of the southern Alliance leaders was Thomas E. Watson, a lawyer from Georgia. The son of prosperous slaveholders who had lost everything after the Civil War, Watson took the lead in urging black and white tenant farmers to join forces. “You are [racially] kept apart,” he told blacks and whites, “that you may be separately fleeced of your earnings.” He insisted on cooperation by black and white farmers to resist the power of the wealthy political elite in the South. In Kansas, Mary Elizabeth Lease emerged as a fiery speaker for the farm protest movement. Born in Pennsylvania to Irish immigrants, Lease migrated to Kansas, taught school, raised a family, and failed at farming in the ­mid-​ ­1880s. She then studied law and became one of the state’s first female attorneys.

 884  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 A proud, tall, and imposing woman with a magical voice, Lease began giving fiery speeches during the 1890s on behalf of struggling farmers. “The people are at bay,” she warned; “let the bloodhounds of money beware.” She urged angry farmers to take control “with the ballot if possible, but if not that way then with the bayonet.” Like so many Alliance supporters, Lease viewed Eastern financiers as the enemy. “Wall Street owns the country. It is no longer a government of the people, by the people, and for the people, but a government of Wall Mary Elizabeth Lease A charismatic Street, by Wall Street, and for Wall leader in the farm protest movement. Street. The great common people of this country are slaves, and monopoly is the master.” The two political parties “lie to us” in blaming farmers for overproduction, “when 10,000 little children starve to death every year in the United States.” She declared that the Alliances wanted to abolish “­loan-​­shark” banks and replace them with subtreasury warehouses that would make loans to farmers backed up by their stored crops.

 the election of 1892

 In 1892, Alliance leaders organized a convention in Omaha, Nebraska, at which they formed the People’s party (Populists). The delegates approved a platform that called for unlimited coinage of silver, a “progressive” income tax whose rates would rise with income levels, and federal ownership of the railroads. The Populists also endorsed the e­ ight-​ ­hour workday and new laws restricting immigration, for fear that foreigners were taking Americans’ jobs. “We meet in the midst of a nation brought to the verge of moral, political, and material ruin,” the Populists announced. “The fruits of toil of millions are boldly stolen to build up colossal fortunes for a few. . . .” The Populist party’s platform turned out to be more exciting than its presidential candidate: Iowa’s James B. Weaver, a former Union army officer who had headed the Greenback party ticket twelve years earlier. The major parties renominated the same candidates who had run in 1888: Democrat Grover Cleveland and Republican president Benjamin Harrison. Each major candidate received more than 5 million votes, but Cleveland won a majority

Farmers and the “Money Problem”  885


 The Populist party A Populist gathering in Callaway, Nebraska, 1892.

 of the electoral college. Weaver received more than 1 million votes and carried Colorado, Kansas, Nevada, and Idaho. Alabama was the banner Populist state of the South, with 37 percent of its vote going to Weaver.

The Depression of 1893 and the
“Free Silver” Crusade
 While farmers were funneling their discontent into politics, a fundamental weakness in the economy was about to cause a major collapse and a social rebellion. Just ten days before Grover Cleveland was inaugurated in the winter of 1893, the Philadelphia and Reading Railroad declared bankruptcy, setting off a national financial crisis, now called the Panic of 1893. It grew into the worst depression the nation had ever experienced. Other overextended railroads collapsed, taking many banks with them. European investors withdrew their funds from America. A quarter of unskilled urban workers lost their jobs, many others had their wages cut, and by the fall of 1893, more than 600 banks had closed and 15,000 businesses had failed. Farm foreclosures soared in the South and West, and by 1900, a third of all American farmers rented their land rather than owned it. By 1894, the nation’s economy had reached bottom. But the depression lasted another four years, with unemployment hovering at 20 percent. In New York City, the rate was close to 35 percent.

 886  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 President Cleveland’s response was recklessly conservative: he convinced Congress to return the nation’s money supply to a gold standard by repealing the Sherman Silver Purchase Act of 1890, a move that made the depression worse. The weak economy needed more money in circulation, not less. Investors rushed to exchange their silver dollars for gold, further constricting the money supply. Hard times triggered a wave of labor unrest. In 1894, some 750,000 workers went on strike. Railroad construction workers, laid off in the West, began tramping east and talked of marching on Washington, D.C. One protest group, called Coxey’s Army, was led by “General” Jacob S. Coxey, a wealthy Ohio quarry owner turned Populist who demanded that the federal government provide the National panic The New York Stock Exchange on the morning of Friday, unemployed with meaningful work. May 5, 1893. Coxey, his wife, and their son, Legal Tender Coxey, rode in a carriage ahead of some 400 protesters who marched hundreds of miles to Washington, D.C., where police arrested Coxey for walking on the grass. Although his ragtag army dispersed peacefully, the march, as well as the growing strength of Populism, struck fear into the hearts of many conservatives. Republicans portrayed Populists as “tramps” and “hayseed socialists” whose election would endanger the capitalist system. The Populists responded by charging that Americans were divided into “tramps and millionaires.” In this climate of class warfare and social anxiety, the 1894 congressional elections devastated President Cleveland and the Democrats, who were blamed for the economic crisis. The Republicans gained 118 seats in the House, the largest increase ever. Only in the solid Democratic South did the party retain its advantage. The Populists emerged with six senators and seven representatives, and they expected the festering discontent in rural areas to carry them to national power in 1896. Their hopes would be dashed, however.

Farmers and the “Money Problem”  887


 silverites versus goldbugs

 Cleveland’s decision to repeal the Sherman Silver Purchase Act created an irreparable division in his party. One ­pro-​­silver Democrat labeled the president a traitor. Politicians from western states with large silver mines increased their demands for the “unlimited” coinage of silver, presenting a strategic dilemma for Populists: should the party promote the long list of reforms it had originally advocated, or should it try to ride the silver issue into power? Although flooding the economy with silver currency would probably not have provided the benefits its advocates claimed, the “free silver” crusade had taken on powerful symbolic overtones. Over the protests of ­more-​­radical members, Populist leaders decided to hold their 1896 nominating convention after the two ­major-​­party conventions, confident that the Republicans and Democrats would at best straddle the silver issue and enable the Populists to lure away ­pro-​­silver advocates from both. The major parties, however, took opposite positions on the currency issue. The Republicans, as expected, nominated William McKinley, a former congressman and governor of Ohio, on a platform committed to gold coins as the only form of currency. A small but vocal group of “Silver Republicans” from western states, led by Senator Henry Teller of Colorado, were so upset that they stormed out of the convention. After the convention, a friend told McKinley that the “money question” would determine the election. He was right. The Democratic convention, held in Chicago, was one of the great turning points in political history. The p ­ ro-​­silver, largely rural delegates surprised the party leadership and the “Gold Democrats,” or “goldbugs,” by capturing control of the convention.

 william jennings bryan

 Thirty-​­six-​­year-​­old William Jennings Bryan of Nebraska gave the final speech before the balloting began. A fiery evangelical moralist, Bryan was a ­two-​­term congressman who had lost a race for the Senate in 1894, when Democrats by the dozens were swept out of office. In the months before the convention, he had traveled throughout the South and West, speaking passionately for the unlimited coinage of silver, attacking Cleveland’s “­do-​­nothing” response to the depression, and endorsing both Democrats and Populists who embraced the cause of “free silver.” Bryan was a compelling speaker, a crusading preacher in the role of a Populist politician. In his carefully crafted and ­well-​­rehearsed speech, he claimed that two ideas about the role of government were competing for the American voter. The Republicans, he said, believed “that if you just legislate to make the ­well-​­to-​­do prosperous, that their prosperity will leak through on those below.”

 888  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 The Democrats, by contrast, believed “that if you legislate to make the masses prosperous their prosperity will find its way up and through every class that rests upon it.” For his part, Bryan spoke for the “producing masses of this nation” against the eastern “financial magnates” who had “enslaved” them by manipulating the money supply to ensure high interest rates. As Bryan brought his electrifying t­wenty-​­minute speech to a climax, he fused Christian imagery with Populist anger: I come to speak to you in defense of a cause as holy as the cause of ­liberty—​­the cause of humanity. . . . ​We have petitioned, and our petitions have been scorned. . . . ​We have begged, and they have mocked when our calamity came. We beg no longer; we entreat no more; we petition no more. We defy them! Bryan then identified himself with Jesus Christ. Sweeping his fingers across his forehead, he shouted: “You shall not press down upon the brow of labor this crown of thorns. You shall not crucify mankind upon a cross of gold!”— at which point he extended his arms straight out from his sides, as if he were being crucified. His riveting performance worked better than even he could have imagined. As he strode triumphantly off the stage, the delegates erupted in wild applause. “Everybody seemed to go mad at once,” reported the New York World. For their part, the Republicans were not all amused by Bryan’s antics. A Republican newspaper observed that no political movement had “ever before spawned such hideous and repulsive vipers.” Theodore Roosevelt claimed that Bryan was a demagogue with an “unsound mind” who was promoting mob rule by “the shiftless and the disorderly and the criminal and the William Jennings Bryan His “cross of gold” speech at the 1896 Democratic s­ emi-​­criminal” elements of society. Convention roused the delegates and The next day, Bryan won the pressecured him the party’s presidential idential nomination on the fifth balnomination. lot, but in the process the Democratic

Farmers and the “Money Problem”  889


 party was fractured. Disappointed Democrats who had supported Grover Cleveland dismissed Bryan as a fanatic and a socialist. They were so alienated by his positions and his rhetoric that they walked out of the convention and nominated their own candidate, Senator John M. Palmer of Illinois. “Fellow Democrats,” Palmer announced, “I will not consider it any great fault if you decide to cast your vote for William McKinley.” When the Populists gathered in St. Louis for their nominating convention two weeks later, they faced an impossible choice. They could name their own candidate and divide the p ­ ro-​­silver vote with the Democrats, or they could endorse Bryan and probably lose their identity. In the end, they backed Bryan but chose their own v­ice-​­presidential candidate, Thomas E. Watson, and invited the Democrats to drop their ­vice-​­presidential nominee. Bryan refused the offer.

 the election of 1896

The
 election of 1896 was one of the most dramatic in history, in part because of the striking contrast between the candidates and in part because the terrible depression made the stakes so high. One observer said that the campaign “took the form of religious frenzy.” Indeed, Bryan campaigned like the evangelist he was. He was the first major candidate since Andrew Jackson to champion the poor, the discontented, and the oppressed. He excited struggling farmers, miners, and union members. And he was the first leader of a major party to call for the expansion of the federal government to help the working class. No one loved campaigning more than Bryan. He traveled some 18,000 miles by train, visiting 26 states and 250 cities and towns, delivering impassioned speeches. His populist crusade was for whites only, however. Like so many otherwise progressive Democratic leaders, Bryan never challenged

 Presidential campaign badges On the left wings of the “goldbug” and “silverite” badges are McKinley (top) and Bryan (bottom), with their running mates on the right.

 890  CHAPTER 19  Political S ­ talemate and Rural Revolt 1865–1900

 the practices of racial segregation and violence against blacks in the solidly Democratic South. And he alienated many w ­ orking-​­class Catholics in northern states by supporting prohibition of alcoholic beverages. McKinley, meanwhile, stayed at home and kept his mouth shut, letting other Republicans speak for him. He knew he could not compete with Bryan as a speaker, so he conducted a “­front-​­porch campaign,” welcoming supporters at his home in Canton, Ohio, and giving only prepared statements to the press which warned m ­ iddle-​­class voters of the dangers of Bryan’s ideas. McKinley’s brilliant campaign manager, Marcus “Mark” Hanna, shrewdly portrayed Bryan as a “Popocrat,” a radical whose “communistic spirit” would ruin the capitalist system and stir up a class war. Hanna convinced the Republican party to declare that it was “unreservedly for sound money”—meaning gold coins. By appealing to such fears, the Republicans raised vast sums of money from corporations and wealthy donors to finance an army of 1,400 speakers who

THE ELECTION OF 1896 WA OR

 CA (+1 Dem.)

MT ID

 NV

 ND

WY UT

AZ TERR.

CO NM TERR.

SD NE

 NH 4 VT 4

 MN

 WI

 IA

KS MO OK TERR.IND. AR TERR. 8 TX

 LA

 IL

 NY

MI IN

 OH

 PA

WV VA 8 12 NC TN 12 SC GA MS AL KY 11
(+1 Dem.) 
ME MA RI 4 CT 6 NJ 10 DE 3 MD 8

 FL

Electoral Vote


Popular Vote


 William McKinley (Republican)



7,100,000


William J. Bryan (Democrat/Populist)




6,500,000


 ■ How did Bryan’s “cross of gold” speech divide the Democratic party? WWN64 ■ How did McKinley’s campaign strategy differ from Bryan’s? Figure M19_3 First ■ proof Why was Bryan able to carry the West and the South but unable to win in

 cities and the Northeast?

Farmers and the “Money Problem”  891


 traveled the country promoting McKinley. It was the most ­sophisticated—​­and ­expensive—​­presidential campaign in history to that point. In the end, Bryan won the most votes of any candidate in ­history—​ 6­ .5 ­million—​­but McKinley won even more: 7.1 million. The ­better-​­organized and ­better-​­financed Republicans won the electoral college vote by 271 to 176. Bryan carried most of the West and all of the South but found little support in the North and East. In the critical Midwest, from Minnesota and Iowa eastward to Ohio, he did not win a state. His evangelical Protestantism repelled many Roman Catholic voters, who were normally drawn to the Democrats. Farmers in the Northeast, moreover, were less attracted to radical reform than were farmers in the West and South. Workers in the cities found it easier to identify with McKinley’s focus on reviving the industrial economy than with Bryan’s ­farm-​­based, ­free-​­silver evangelism. Of the nation’s twenty largest cities, Bryan carried only New Orleans. Although Bryan lost, he launched the Democratic party’s shift from ­pro-​ ­business conservatism to its eventual ­twentieth-​­century role as a party of liberal reform. The Populist party, however, virtually disintegrated. Having won a million votes in 1896, it collected only 50,000 in 1900. Conversely, McKinley’s victory climaxed a g­ eneration-​­long struggle for political control of an industrialized urban America. The Republicans would be dominant for sixteen years. By 1897, when McKinley was inaugurated, economic prosperity was returning. Part of the reason was inflation of the currency, which bore out the arguments of the Greenbackers and silverites that the nation’s money supply had been inadequate during the Gilded Age. But inflation came, in one of history’s many ironies, not from more greenbacks or silver dollars but from a flood of gold discovered in South Africa, northwest Canada, and Alaska. In 1900, Congress passed, and McKinley signed, a bill affirming that the nation’s money supply would be based only on gold. Even though the Populist movement faded after William Jennings Bryan’s defeat, most of the ideas promoted by Bryan Democrats and Populists, dismissed as too radical in 1896, would be implemented over the next two decades by a more diverse coalition of Democrats and Republicans who would call themselves “progressives.”

CHAPTER REVIEW
Summary • 
 America’s Move to Town America’s cities grew in all directions during the Gilded Age. Electric elevators and ­steel-​­frame construction allowed architects to extend buildings upward, and mass transit enabled the middle class to retreat to suburbs. Crowded tenements bred disease and crime and created an opportunity for urban party bosses to accrue power, in part by distributing to the poor various forms of assistance.

•


 The New Immigration By 1900, an estimated 30 percent of Americans living in major cities were f­ oreign-​­born, with the majority of “new immigrants” coming from eastern and southern Europe rather than western and northern Europe, like most immigrants of generations past. Their languages, culture, and religion were quite different from those of ­native-​­born Americans. Beginning in the 1880s, nativists advocated restrictive immigration laws and won passage of the Chinese Exclusion Act.

•


 Changes in Culture and Thought Many areas of American life underwent profound changes during the Gilded Age. The growth of large cities led to the popularity of vaudeville and Wild West shows and to the emergence of spectator sports. Saloons served as local social and political clubs for men, despite the disapproval of ­anti-​­liquor groups. Charles Darwin’s On the Origin of Species shocked people who believed in a literal interpretation of the Bible’s account of creation. Proponents of social Darwinism applied Darwin’s theory of evolution to human society by equating economic and social success with “survival of the fittest” and arguing that government should not try to promote equality or protect the less successful. Reform Darwinism held that collective efforts and social reform could guide human progress.

•


 Gilded Age Politics Huge corporations corrupted politics and used their money to buy political influence. Political activity was still concentrated at the state and local levels. Americans were intensely loyal to the two major parties, whose local “bosses” and “machines” won votes by distributing patronage jobs and contracts to members, as well as charitable relief. Party loyalties reflected regional, ethnic, and religious differences. Although Republicans almost always held the presidency, the overall strength of the major parties was so balanced that neither wanted to risk alienating voters by taking bold stands.

•


 Corruption and Reform National politics during the Gilded Age focused on tariffs, the regulation of corporations, and civil service reform. The passage of the Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act in 1883 began the professionalization of federal workers. In the 1884 presidential election, Republicans favoring reform, the Mugwumps, helped elect Democrat Grover Cleveland. Cleveland signed the 1887 act creating the Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) to regulate railroads. In 1890, under President Benjamin Harrison, Republicans passed the Sherman ­Anti-​­Trust Act, the Sherman Silver Purchase Act, and the McKinley Tariff Act. The first proved ineffective; the third, which raised tariff rates, proved unpopular and led to Cleveland’s return to the White House in the 1892 election.



•


 Inadequate Currency Supply and Unhappy Farmers Over the course of the late nineteenth century, the “money question” had become a central political issue. The supply of money had not increased as the economy had grown. Many farmers believed that the coinage of silver, rather than a gold standard system, would result in inflation, which in turn would increase the value of their crops and reduce their debts. Farmers and others unsatisfied with the Republican and Democratic parties formed a series of political parties and alliances, one of which, the People’s party, briefly operated as a national third party. In the election of 1896, the Democratic party nominated William Jennings Bryan, who adopted the coinage of silver as his crusade. He was opposed by Republican William McKinley, who supported the gold standard. McKinley, better organized and better financed, won the election in part by appealing to the growing number of city dwellers and industrial workers.

Chronology


 Charles Darwin’s On the Origin of Species is published President James A. Garfield is assassinated Congress passes the Chinese Exclusion Act Congress passes the Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act Supreme Court issues Wabash, St. Louis, and Pacific Railroad Company v. Illinois decision Interstate Commerce Commission is created Congress passes the Sherman ­Anti-​­Trust Act, the Sherman Silver Purchase Act, and the McKinley Tariff

Key Terms


Gilded Age p. 847


 patronage p. 865

 tenements p. 849

 civil service reform p. 869

 “new immigrants” p. 853

Mugwumps p. 873


 nativists p. 854

Interstate Commerce Commission
 (ICC) p. 875

Chinese Exclusion Act (1882) p. 856
 saloons p. 858 social Darwinism p. 860 reform Darwinism p. 861 party bosses p. 865

 tariff reform p. 875 People’s party (or Populists) p. 884 Panic of 1893 p. 885 “money question” p. 887

IJK
Go to InQuizitive to see what you’ve learned—and learn what you’ve missed—with personalized feedback along the way. 


•


 pa r t s i x

MODERN ­AMERICA
The United States entered the twentieth century on a wave of unrelenting change, not all of it beneficial. The nation was on the threshold of modernity, which both excited and scared Americans. Old truths and beliefs clashed with unsettling scientific discoveries and social practices. People debated the legitimacy of Darwinism, the existence of God, the dangers of jazz, and the federal effort to prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages. The advent of automobiles and airplanes helped shrink distance, and such 


 communications innovations as radio and film helped strengthen the sense that America now had a national culture. Spurred by its growing industrial power, the United States began to emerge from its isolationist shell. Previously, presidents and statesmen had sought to isolate America from the intrigues and conflicts of European powers. As early as 1780, John Adams had warned against U.S. involvement in Europe’s affairs. “Our business with them, and theirs with us,” he wrote, “is commerce, not politics, much less war.” With only a few exceptions, statesmen during the nineteenth century followed such advice. Noninvolvement in foreign wars and nonintervention in the internal affairs of foreign governments formed the pillars of U. S. foreign policy. During the 1890s, however, expanding commercial interests led Americans to broaden their concerns. Imperialism was the focus of the major European powers, and a growing number of expansionists demanded that the United States join in the hunt for new territories and markets. Others believed the United States should support democratic ideals abroad. Such mixed motives helped spark the ­Spanish-American War (the War of 1898) and helped justify the resulting acquisition of colonies outside the continental United States. Entangling alliances with European powers soon followed. The outbreak of the Great War in Europe in 1914 posed an even greater challenge to America’s tradition of nonintervention. The prospect of a German victory over the French and British threatened the European balance of power, which had long ensured the security of the United States. By 1917, it appeared that Germany might emerge triumphant and begin to menace the Western Hemisphere. As German submarines began sinking American merchant ships, President Woodrow Wilson’s patience finally ran out, and in April 1917, the United States entered the war. Wilson’s crusade to transform international affairs in accordance with his idealistic principles dislodged American foreign policy from its isolationist moorings. It also spawned a prolonged debate about the nation’s role in world ­affairs—​­a debate that World War II would resolve (for a time) on the side of internationalism. While the United States was becoming a formidable military power, it was also settling in as a great industrial nation. Cities and factories sprouted across the landscape, and an abundance of new jobs and affordable farmland attracted millions of foreign immigrants. They were not always welcomed, nor were they readily assimilated. Ethnic and racial strife grew, as did labor agitation. In the midst of such social turmoil and unparalleled economic d ­ evelopment, reformers made their first sustained attempt to adapt political and social

﻿  897


 i­nstitutions to the realities of the industrial age. The worst excesses and injustices of urban-industrial development—corporate monopolies, child labor, political corruption, hazardous working conditions, urban ghettos—­were finally addressed in a comprehensive way. During the Progressive Era (1890–1917), local, state, and federal governments sought to rein in the excesses of industrial capitalism and develop a more rational and efficient public policy. A conservative Republican resurgence challenged the notion of the new regulatory state during the 1920s, and free enterprise and corporate capitalism witnessed a dramatic revival. But the stock market crash of 1929 helped propel the United States and the world into the worst economic downturn in history. The unprecedented severity of the Great Depression renewed demands for federal programs to protect the general welfare. The many New Deal initiatives and agencies instituted by President Franklin Delano Roosevelt and his Democratic administration created the framework for a welfare state that has since served as the basis for public policy. The New Deal revived public confidence and put people back to work, but it took a second world war to end the Great Depression and restore full employment. The necessity of mobilizing the nation to support the Second World War also accelerated the growth of the federal government, and the unparalleled scope of the war helped catapult the United States into a leadership role in world politics. The use of atomic bombs ushered in a new era of nuclear diplomacy that held the fate of the world in the balance. For all the new creature comforts associated with modern life, Americans in 1945 found themselves living amid an array of new anxieties.





Seizing an
American
­Empire
1865–1913


The Charge of the Rough Riders of San Juan Hill (1898) Before Frederic Remington
 pursued art professionally, he had unsuccessful forays into hunting, ranching, and even the saloon business in the West. His intimacy with the Western way of life, along with his technical skill and keen sense of observation, were not lost on Theodore Roosevelt, who invited Remington to travel with the Rough Riders during the ­Spanish-​ ­American War.

A


 fter the Civil War, a mood of ­isolationism—​­a desire to stay out of conflicts elsewhere in the ­world—​­dominated American public opinion. The nation’s geographic advantages encouraged this isolationist attitude: oceans to the east and west, and militarily weak neighbors in the Western Hemisphere. That the powerful British navy protected the shipping lanes between the United States and the British Isles gave Americans a heightened sense of security. By the end of the nineteenth century, however, a dramatic transformation occurred in America’s outlook. People grew increasingly aware that the country was a world power with global responsibilities and imperial ambitions. As a Kentucky newspaper editor proclaimed in 1893, the United States was “the most advanced and powerful” nation in the world, an “imperial Republic” destined to shape the “future of the world.” The Washington Post agreed, revealing that “the Taste of Empire is in the mouth of the people.” While still wanting to stay out of European conflicts, a growing number of Americans urged officials to acquire additional territory outside North America. The old idea of “manifest destiny”—that the United States had been blessed by God (“destined”) to expand its territory westward across the c­ ontinent—​ ­was enlarged to include extending American control into other regions of the Western Hemisphere, and even to the Pacific and Asia. Americans embraced a new form of expansionism that sought distant territories as “colonies,” with no intention of admitting them to the nation as equal states. The new manifest destiny, in other words, became a justification for imperialism.

 focus questions 1. What factors motivated America’s new imperialism after the Civil War? 2. How and why did America expand its influence in the Pacific before the S ­ panish-​­American War (War of 1898)?

 3. What were the causes of the ­Spanish-​­American War (War of 1898)? What were its major events?

 4. What were the consequences of the ­Spanish-​­American War (War of 1898) for American foreign policy?

 5. What reasons were behind Theodore Roosevelt’s rapid rise to the presidency? What were the main elements of his foreign policies?



